Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Municipally Owned Utilities

§ 21-27-11.
Definitions.

Whenever used in Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69:

The term “municipality” includes any incorporated city, town or village of the State of Mississippi, whether incorporated under a special charter or under the general laws of the State of Mississippi governing municipalities, and operating under any form of municipal government. However, for the purpose of establishing a motor vehicle transportation system for the transportation of passengers within the boundaries of the governmental unit or units concerned, and within three (3) miles thereof, the word “municipality” is defined to include counties and groups of municipalities and shall allow those governmental units to establish a commission as provided in Section 21-27-13 and exercise the powers granted in Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69. Each county or municipality joining together shall be allowed at least one (1) commissioner representing that governing authority. For the purpose of establishing a railroad transportation system for passengers and freight, the term “municipality” includes any county bordering the Mississippi River and in which Highways 49 and 61 intersect, and such county may exercise the powers granted in Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69;

The term “system” includes waterworks system, water supply system, sewage system, sewage disposal system, or any combination thereof, including any combined waterworks and sewage system, consisting of an existing waterworks system or water supply system or both, combined with an existing sewage system or sewage disposal system or both, or consisting of an existing waterworks system or water supply system or both, combined with a sewage system or sewage disposal system or both, to be acquired, (as defined herein), or consisting of an existing sewage system or sewage disposal system or both, combined with a waterworks system or water supply system or both, to be acquired, (as defined herein), gas producing system, gas generating system, gas transmission system or gas distribution system, or any one (1) or all thereof, electric generating, transmission, or distribution system, garbage disposal system, rubbish disposal system, and incinerators, and all parts and appurtenances thereof. The term “system” also includes a motor vehicle transportation system for the transportation of passengers within the city limits and within three (3) miles thereof. The term “system” also includes a railroad transportation system of any municipality located within a county bordering the Mississippi River and in which Highways 49 and 61 intersect for the transportation of passengers and freight regardless of the amount of area outside the jurisdictional limits of such municipality for which the system provides service; the railroad transportation system may be located partially outside the boundaries of the county. The term “system” also includes a motor vehicle transportation system for the transportation of passengers of any municipality with a population of more than forty-five thousand (45,000) but less than forty-five thousand one hundred (45,100) according to the 1970 federal decennial census regardless of the amount of area outside the city limits of such municipality for which the system provides service. Wherever in Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69 any one or more of the systems authorized under this section are referred to, the same shall include motor vehicle transportation systems. The term “system” also includes any franchise held by the owner thereof and shall also include operations within the capabilities of any component facility within the system which reasonably utilize the public resources;

The term “improvement” includes repair, betterment, enlargement, extension and other improvements to a system;

The term “acquire” includes construct, purchase, gift, exercise of power of eminent domain and other methods by which a municipality may acquire a system;

The term “improve” includes repair, better, enlarge, extend and other methods of improving a system;

The term “ordinance” includes ordinance, resolution or other appropriate legislative enactment of the governing authorities of any municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3519-07, 3519-07.7; Laws, 1934, ch. 317; Laws, 1936, ch. 186; Laws, 1942, ch. 231; Laws, 1950, ch 494, § 7; Laws, 1952, ch. 372 § 22; Laws, 1962, ch. 550, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 496, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 411, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 502, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 520, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 313, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2000.).

§ 21-27-13.
Establishment of public utility commission; qualifications, appointment, terms of office, powers and duties, compensation and bonds of commissioners; exercise of powers when commission not established.

The governing authorities of any municipality which now owns and operates, or hereafter shall own and operate, any system or systems shall have the power and authority to create a commission to control, manage and operate such systems, or any one or more of them, which said commission shall consist of not less than three (3) nor more than five (5) commissioners, to be elected by the governing authorities of such municipality. In any municipality operating under the council-manager plan of government, such commissioners shall be selected by, and shall be under the control of, the mayor and councilmen of the municipality, and not the city or town manager. Such commissioners shall have the power, authority and duty to manage and control said system or systems and the supply of the facilities and services thereof, both within and without the limits of the municipality. Such commissioners shall be qualified electors of the municipality and shall not hold any other municipal office for honor or profit. Such commissioners shall receive such compensation as may be specified and provided by the governing authorities of said municipality; provided, however, that any commission formed for the purpose of establishing a motor vehicle transportation system for the transportation of passengers within the boundaries of the governmental unit or units concerned, and within three (3) miles thereof, may pay its commissioners from the operating budget of such commission per diem compensation in the amount provided by Section 25-3-69 for each day or fraction of a day engaged in attendance of meetings of the commission or engaged in other official duties of the commission, not to exceed forty-five (45) days in any one (1) year. The governing authorities of the municipality are hereby authorized and empowered to require such commissioners to furnish bonds for the faithful performance of their duties, in the amount as may be deemed proper, and to pay the premiums thereon from the municipal treasury or the available funds of the said system or systems. Where there are three (3) members of such commission, the term of office shall be for a period of three (3) years, and where there are four (4) members the term of office shall be for a period of four (4) years, and where there are five (5) members the term of office shall be for a period of five (5) years. However, in making the first appointment of commissioners, one (1) shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year, one (1) for a term of two (2) years, one (1) for a term of three (3) years and, where necessary, one (1) for a term of four (4) years, and one (1) for a term of five (5) years, so that thereafter the term of office of one (1) commissioner shall expire each year. Where the governing authorities of the municipality do not elect to create a commission as herein provided, then any system or systems owned and operated by the municipality shall be controlled and managed by the governing authorities of the municipality, who shall have all the power and authority conferred upon such commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6007, 6008; 1930, §§ 2617, 2618; 1942, §§ 3519-01, 3519-01.5; Laws, 1910, ch. 170; Laws, 1940, ch. 283; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 23; Laws, 1995, ch. 451, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 21-27-15.
Governing authorities may remove any commissioner for cause, but may not abolish the commission.

The governing authorities of such municipality shall have the power to remove any member of said commission for inefficiency or incompetency or any other cause, but the governing authority of any municipality which has created a commission under the terms of Section 21-27-13, shall not have authority to abolish the commission, or to diminish its powers, except by a vote of a majority of the qualified electors of such municipality at a special election, duly called and held for that purpose. However, nothing herein shall limit, alter, impair or in any way change the procedure prescribed for the sale or lease of a public utility system under Section 21-27-33.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6011; 1930, § 2621; 1942, § 3519-04; Laws, 1910, ch. 170; Laws, 1940, ch. 283; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 549, eff from and after passage (approved May 31, 1962).

§ 21-27-17.
Powers and duties of commission.

The commission provided for by Section 21-27-13 is authorized to make such bylaws for the holding and conduct of its meetings and such other regulations as it may deem necessary for the safe, economic and efficient management and protection of the system or systems, and such bylaws and regulations shall have the same validity as an ordinance duly passed by the governing authorities of any municipality.

It is authorized to elect such officers and appoint such employees as may be necessary to operate the system or systems efficiently, and it shall have the entire control and management of such system or systems, together with all property connected or appertaining in any manner to such system or systems. The commission shall have the authority to employ a superintendent or manager of the systems, who shall have actual charge of the management and operation thereof and of the enforcement and execution of all the rules, regulations, programs, plans and decisions made and adopted by the commission in making purchases for materials and supplies to be used in the operation of the systems. In addition to any other purchasing authority granted by law, the commission may purchase electric transmission line materials, electric distribution system substation equipment, transformer equipment, and all other appliances, apparatus, machinery, equipment and appurtenances necessary for the sale of electricity, such as utility vehicles and fencing, from the surplus inventory of the Tennessee Valley Authority or any other similar agency of the federal government and electric power associations. These purchases shall be exempt from the public bid requirements prescribed in Sections 31-7-12 and 31-7-13. However, for all other purchases, the commission shall advertise for competitive bids in the manner and form as is required in accordance with Section 31-7-13. The superintendent or manager shall make and keep full and proper books and records of all purchases and shall submit them to the commission for its approval and ratification before payment thereof is authorized to be made. The commission may authorize the superintendent or manager to immediately refund to a customer of the municipally owned utility his or her deposit for municipal utility services after the superintendent or manager has determined that payment for all services and any other obligations which the customer may have incurred in regard to the municipal utility has been made. It shall have the right to fix the salaries and term of office of all employees and to direct them in the discharge of their duties. It shall have the right to require good and sufficient bonds from all officers and employees in such amounts as it may deem proper. It shall have the right to discharge employees when found inefficient or for other good cause. It shall have the power to make and collect rates for services and facilities, and appropriate funds for the maintenance and improvements of such systems. It is authorized to borrow from the Mississippi Development Bank in order to fund advance purchases of energy for gas producing, generating, transmission or distribution system or its electric generating, transmission or distribution system. It is authorized to insure all property used in the operation of such systems, including buildings, furniture, books and records, against loss by fire and tornado, and to carry sufficient amount of employers liability, steam boiler, plate glass and other miscellaneous casualty insurance, as in the discretion of the commission may be deemed proper, and to pay premiums therefor out of the funds derived from the operation of the systems. It shall report quarterly to the governing authorities of the municipality of all its doings and transactions of every kind whatsoever and shall make a complete statement of the financial condition of the systems at the end of each quarter, and shall annually make a detailed statement covering the entire management and operation of the systems, with any recommendations which it may have for the further development of the systems. At any time, the commission, by order or resolution, may authorize the expansion of activities of any component facility to include processing of materials on a custom basis or the processing and marketing of materials acquired to fully and efficiently utilize existing plant capacity. It shall also provide copies of all such quarterly and annual reports and statements to the Public Service Commission when so directed under Section 77-3-6.

The commission provided for by Section 21-27-13 is also authorized to allow a municipally owned utility to prepay the utility’s bills to those electricity suppliers which offer early payment discounts to the municipally owned utility.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6009, 6010; 1930, §§ 2619, 2620; 1942, §§ 3519-02, 3519-03; Laws, 1910, ch. 170; Laws, 1940, ch. 283; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, §§ 2, 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 18; Laws, 1984, ch. 495, § 14; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 23; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 10; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 16; Laws, 1987, ch. 502, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 13; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 12; Laws, 1990, ch. 455, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 13; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 12; Laws, 1992, ch. 491 § 13; Laws, 1994, ch. 547, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 418, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 347, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 21-27-19.
Disposition of revenues by commission.

The commission shall devote all monies, derived from any source other than the issuance of bonds for purposes authorized by the laws of the State of Mississippi, to or for the payment of all operating expenses, including such items as are normally required of utilities for sales development; to or for the payment of all bonds and interest on outstanding revenue bonds, if any, of such systems; to or for the acquisition and improvement of the system contingencies; to or for the payment of all other obligations incurred in the operation and maintenance of the systems and the furnishing of service; to or for the creation and maintenance of a cash working fund or a surplus fund to be used for replacement, extension of systems, and emergencies. The balance of the revenues of said systems, if any, may be used for any other lawful municipal purpose and may be paid to the governing authorities of the municipality for distribution to the various municipal funds, or may be disbursed for said purpose by the said commission at the direction and request of the governing authorities of such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6012; 1930, § 2622; 1942, § 3519-05; Laws, 1910, ch. 170; Laws, 1940, ch. 283; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 5; Laws, 1958, ch. 529, § 1.

§ 21-27-21.
Commission to keep records of service furnished municipality.

The commission shall keep an accurate account and record of power, current, water, or other services furnished to all departments of the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-06; Laws, 1940, ch. 283; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-23.
General powers of municipality as to creation, maintenance, and operation of public utility systems.

Any municipality may:

Borrow money and issue revenue bonds therefor solely for the purposes specified in this section and by the procedure provided in Sections 21-27-41 through 21-27-69.

Money may be borrowed and bonds issued by any municipality of the State of Mississippi, as defined in Section 21-27-11, to acquire or improve any waterworks system, water supply system, sewerage system, sewage disposal system, garbage disposal system, rubbish disposal system or incinerators, gas producing system, gas generating system, gas transmission system, or gas distribution system, electric generating, transmission or distribution system, railroad transportation system for passengers and freight, or motor vehicle transportation system, including any combination of any or all of those systems into one (1) system, within or without the corporate limits thereof, for the purpose of supplying the municipality and the persons and corporations, both public and private, whether within or without its corporate limits, with the services and facilities afforded by the system, provided that water, electric energy, or gas afforded by any system or systems may be supplied to such ultimate consumers thereof by sale thereof to the owners or operators of a distribution system for resale to the public. Any municipality which shall borrow money and issue revenue bonds to provide funds with which to acquire a gas transmission system, if necessary in order to reach and obtain a source of supply of gas for the municipality, may extend or construct its gas transmission line into an adjoining state, and may use and expend part of the proceeds of such issue of revenue bonds for the purpose.

To assume all indebtedness for any system or systems which may be acquired under the provisions of this section as all or part of the consideration for the acquisition of such system or systems and to issue its revenue bonds in exchange for the bonds or notes evidencing the indebtedness.

To acquire or improve any system which it is authorized to borrow money and issue revenue bonds under subsection (a) of this section to acquire or improve; and to make contracts in furtherance thereof or in connection therewith.

To own, operate and maintain any such system or combination of any and all of said systems into one (1) system.

To establish, maintain and collect rates for the facilities and services offered by any such system; provided that if there is a combination of systems into one or more systems, the municipality establishing the same shall be and is empowered to establish, maintain and collect rates for any and all of the services or for any combination thereof, and the municipality may discontinue any or all of the services upon any failure to promptly pay the charges fixed for the services. The rates so fixed for services rendered by any system or combination thereof may be charged for all services rendered thereby, regardless of whether the services may have been previously rendered without rates or charges therefor by the previously existing waterworks system, water supply system, sewerage system, sewage disposal system, garbage disposal system, rubbish disposal system or incinerators, gas producing system, gas generating system, gas transmission system, or gas distribution system, electric generating, transmission or distribution system, which shall have been merged into the combined system. Any such municipality may pledge for the payment of any bonds issued to acquire or improve any such combined system, or to refund any bonds previously issued to acquire or improve any such combined system or to acquire or improve any system merged with such combined system, the revenues to be derived from the operation of such combined system, including the charges authorized to be imposed by this section.

A municipality may authorize a municipally owned utility to make early payment of the utility’s bills to its electricity suppliers which offer early payment discounts to the municipally owned utility. The municipality may immediately refund to a customer of the municipally owned utility his or her deposit for municipal utility services after the municipal utility has determined that payment for all services and any other obligations which the customer may have incurred in regard to the municipal utility has been made.

If the revenues of any previously existing system being merged into a combined system are subject to a prior lien, the revenues and the expenses of any previously existing system shall be accounted for separately to the extent necessary to satisfy the covenants relating to the prior lien for so long as the indebtedness secured by the revenues shall remain outstanding. Only surplus revenues remaining after the satisfaction of all covenants relating to the outstanding indebtedness may be pledged to the retirement of any indebtedness to be secured by the revenues of a combined system. The existence of the outstanding indebtedness shall not, in and of itself, prevent the combining of systems as herein provided, so long as the prior lien on the revenues of any previously existing system is fully satisfied from the revenues of the previously existing system.

To acquire property, real or personal, which may be necessary to effectuate the powers conferred by this section. The municipality may purchase electric transmission line materials, electric distribution system substation equipment, transformer equipment, and all other appliances, apparatus, machinery, equipment and appurtenances necessary for the sale of electricity, such as utility vehicles and fencing, from the surplus inventory of the Tennessee Valley Authority or any other similar agency of the federal government and electric power associations. These purchases by the municipality shall be exempt from the public bid requirements prescribed in Sections 31-7-12 and 31-7-13. If the power of eminent domain is exercised, it shall be exercised in the manner provided by Sections 11-27-1 through 11-27-51.

To enter into contract with the United States of America or any agency thereof, under the provisions of acts of the Congress of the United States, to aid or encourage public works and the regulations made in pursuance thereof, for the sale of bonds issued in accordance with the provisions of Sections 21-27-41 through 21-27-69 or for the acceptance of a grant to aid such municipality in acquiring or improving any such system; and the contracts may contain terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by and between the municipality and the United States of America or any agency thereof, or any purchaser of the bonds.

To adopt the ordinances and resolutions and to do all things and perform all acts necessary, proper or desirable to effectuate the full intent and purpose of Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69, including processing, marketing, custom processing, sale and resale of materials processed through any facility under its jurisdiction.

To borrow from the Mississippi Development Bank in order to fund the advance purchase of energy for its gas producing, generating, transmission or distribution system or its electric generating, transmission or distribution system.

Enter into an interlocal agreement in accordance with Section 21-27-75.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-08; Laws, 1934, ch. 317; Laws, 1936, ch. 186; Laws, 1942, ch. 231; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 8; Laws, 1962, chs. 551, 552; Laws, 1973, ch. 389, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 451; Laws, 1982, ch. 368, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 502, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 547, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 498, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 418, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 347, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 520, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1999; Laws, 2018, ch. 330, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 21-27-25.
Borrowing money for improvement, extension, repair or stockpiling fuel of system.

Any municipality which owns or operates any system, shall have the power and authority through its utilities commission to borrow money and issue its negotiable notes or certificates of indebtedness therefor, in an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the gross revenues of the system in the last preceding fiscal year, in any calendar year, for the purpose of improving, repairing or extending any such system, or of stockpiling fuel for any such system, or systems, without the necessity of calling and holding an election upon such question or otherwise obtaining the consent of the qualified electors of the municipality, or giving any notice thereof. However, the utilities commission shall secure approval of the governing authorities of the municipality. In all cases where money is borrowed under the provisions of this section, the same shall be repaid within three (3) years and at no time shall the amount of money borrowed under this section exceed thirty percent (30%) of the gross revenues of the system for the last preceding fiscal year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-26; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 26; Laws, 1958, ch. 529, § 5; Laws, 1978, ch. 337, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 7, 1978).

§ 21-27-27.
Free service.

No free service shall be furnished by any such system, or combined system, to any private person, firm, corporation, or association. The municipality may, however, furnish such service, free of charge, to the municipality or any agency or department thereof, to any public school, or to any hospital or benevolent institution located within such municipality, including county, city, and community fairs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-14; Laws, 1934, ch. 316; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-29.
Rates not to be supervised by state; no franchise required.

Rates charged for services furnished by any system or combined system purchased, constructed, improved, enlarged, extended or repaired under the provisions of Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69 shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any state bureau, board, commission, or other like instrumentality or agency thereof. It shall not be necessary for any municipality operating under the provisions of said sections to obtain any franchise or other permit from any state bureau, board, commission or other instrumentality thereof, in order to construct, improve, enlarge, extend or repair any system or combined system. However, billing and service disputes between the system and its customers shall be subject to review and arbitration by the Public Service Commission as provided under Section 77-3-6.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-18; Laws, 1934, ch. 316; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 18; Laws, 1990, ch. 455, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 21-27-31.
Keeping of books and accounts by municipality.

Any municipality issuing revenue bonds pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23 shall install and maintain proper books of record and account (separate entirely from other records and accounts of such municipality), in which correct entries shall be made of all dealings or transactions of or in relation to the properties, business and affairs of the system or combined system. The governing authorities of such municipality, not later than three months after the close of any calendar, operating or fiscal year, shall cause to be prepared a balance sheet and an income and operating and surplus account showing, respectively, in reasonable detail, the financial condition of the system or combined system at the close of such preceding calendar, operating or fiscal year, and the financial operations thereof during such year. Said balance sheet and the income and operating and surplus account shall at all times during the usual business hours be open to examination and inspection by any taxpayer, user of the services furnished by the system, or any holder of bonds issued pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23, or any one acting for or on behalf of such taxpayer, user of the services of the system, or bondholder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-19; Laws, 1934, ch. 316; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-33.
Municipality may dispose of public utility systems.

All municipalities of the state are hereby empowered and authorized, if they so desire, to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any or all electric, water, gas or other municipally-owned public utility systems or properties on such terms and conditions, and with such safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest. Said municipal corporations are empowered and authorized to transfer title to said public utility properties by warranty deed, bill of sale, contract, or lease, in the manner provided by law. However, notice of intention to make such sale, lease, or disposition of any such system, setting out the price and other general terms and conditions of such proposed sale, lease, or disposition shall be given by publication, once a week for three consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper published in such municipality, and if no such newspaper be published in said municipality, then in some newspaper having a general circulation in such municipality. After ten days from the last publication of such notice, the system may be disposed of, unless within ten days after the last publication of such notice a petition signed by not less than twenty per centum of the qualified voters of such municipality be filed, objecting to and protesting against such sale, lease, or disposition, in which event the same shall not be made unless submitted to a special election ordered for the purpose of determining whether a majority of those voting in such election shall vote for or against such sale, lease, or other disposition. Such election shall be ordered to be held not less than forty days after the date of the last notice of the proposed sale, lease or disposition. Notice of such election, stating the purpose of election, shall be published once each week for three consecutive weeks next preceding the time set for holding said election in such newspaper as herein provided. The laws governing special municipal elections shall govern the ordering and conduct of said election.

The ballots provided shall have plainly written or printed thereon the words “shall the waterworks, electric, or gas (as the case may be) system be sold, leased, or disposed of (as the case may be)” and below said words shall be suitably placed on separate lines, the words “yes” and “no,” so that the voter may indicate the way he desires to vote on the question submitted.

If a majority of those voting in said election shall vote in favor of such sale, lease, or disposition, then the proper officer of the municipality may proceed to sell, lease or dispose of such system in accordance with the terms and conditions set out in the notice of proposed intention to sell, lease or dispose of such system, as herein provided. If such election is determined against such sale, lease or disposition of such system, then such system shall not be sold, leased or disposed of, but shall remain the property of the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2455; 1942, § 3519-24; Laws, 1924, ch. 196; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-35.
Utilization of proceeds of sale of public utility system.

The governing authorities of any municipality which have sold or which may hereafter sell any utility system owned by such municipality, may use the proceeds of the sale of such system, or any part thereof, for the purpose of retiring and paying off any of the public debt of the municipality, and they may purchase the outstanding bonds or other obligations of the said municipality at such price, whether above or below par, as they may consider fair and reasonable. The said governing authorities may, in their discretion, invest the said funds, or any part thereof, derived from the sale of the said system or systems in any of the securities now eligible for purchase by public sinking funds of municipalities, at such price, whether above or below par, as they may determine to be fair and reasonable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2550; 1942, § 3519-25; Laws, 1928, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-37.
Inspection of utility authorized; penalty for violation.

The governing authorities of every municipality shall have power to inspect or cause to be inspected the machinery, appliances and premises of all persons, copartnerships or corporations owning or operating any system within their corporate limits, in order to ascertain whether or not the said machinery, appliances and premises are kept in a sanitary condition and in condition to comply with the terms and requirements of the franchise or franchises under which the said system or systems are operated.

If any person, copartnership or corporation, or any employee thereof, shall refuse to permit the municipal governing authorities to make such inspection immediately when requested so to do, they shall, for each such refusal, forfeit the sum of one thousand dollars, to be recovered in an action in the name of said municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5890, 5891; 1930, §§ 2458, 2459; 1942, § 3519-27; Laws, 1910, ch. 147; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-39.
Municipalities may furnish services to consumers outside corporate limits.

All municipalities owning or operating any system or systems may supply consumers residing outside of and within five (5) miles of the corporate limits of the municipality. In any county traversed by two (2) or more natural gas transmission lines and having therein two (2) or more natural gas compressor stations engaged in rendering service in interstate commerce, and wherein a natural gas transmission line of a municipality can be laid wholly in alluvial soil, where it is necessary for any municipality having a population of less than one thousand (1,000), according to the federal census of 1950, to construct a gas transmission line for a distance of more than five (5) miles but not more than eleven (11) miles from its corporate limits to the nearest point at which an adequate supply of natural gas can be obtained, and where there are not less than two hundred (200) prospective gas customers residing outside the corporate limits of such municipality but along and within one-half (1/2) mile of the gas transmission line so constructed by the municipality, then and in that event, the municipality may supply natural gas to such customers. Any municipality having its own natural gas transmission system in any county bordering the State of Alabama, in which U.S. Highway No. 78 and State Highway No. 25 intersect, and in which there is a publicly supported junior college, may extend its transmission lines and supply customers within the county for a distance of fifteen (15) miles from the corporate limits. Any municipality having a population of less than one thousand (1,000) people, according to the federal census of 1960, and being located in the county in which U.S. Highway 51 and U.S. Highway 82 intersect, and in the county where the main line of Illinois Central Railroad and Columbus and Greenville Railroad intersect, may construct a gas transmission line and supply customers within a four-county area for a distance of forty-five (45) miles from the corporate limits of the municipality. Any municipality having its own water distribution system, the construction or expansion of which has been financed in whole or in part by an agency of the United States government, and having a population of less than five hundred (500) persons, and located in a county in which Mississippi State Highways Number 12 and Number 429 intersect, may construct, expand and operate its water distribution system within the county or adjoining counties for a distance of fifteen (15) miles from the corporate limits. Any municipality having its own water distribution system, the construction or expansion of which has been financed in whole or in part by an agency of the United States government, and having a population of less than fifteen hundred (1500) persons, and located in a county in which Highway 15 and Highway 32 intersect and has a national forest, may construct, expand and operate its water distribution system within the county or adjoining counties for a distance of fifteen (15) miles from the corporate limits.

Any municipality having its own water distribution system and located in a county having two (2) judicial districts, and in which Mississippi Highways 17 and 35 intersect, may construct, expand and operate its water distribution system within the county or adjoining counties for a distance of fifteen (15) miles from the corporate limits. Any municipality having its own water distribution system, wherein U.S. Highway 51 and Mississippi Highway 35 intersect, and located in a county in which U.S. Highway 82 and Mississippi Highway 17 intersect, may construct, expand and operate its water distribution system within the county or adjoining counties for a distance of fifteen (15) miles from the corporate limits. Whenever such service shall be furnished to any consumer residing outside the corporate limits thereof, such consumer may not be charged at a rate greater than twice the rate charged for such services within the municipality.

Any municipality located within a county bordering the Mississippi River and in which Highways 49 and 61 intersect may acquire, construct, expand and operate its railroad transportation system for the transportation of passengers and freight for more than five (5) miles outside its corporate limits and outside the boundaries of the county in which it is located. Any municipality having a population of more than forty-five thousand (45,000) but less than forty-five thousand one hundred (45,100) according to the 1970 federal decennial census, may expand its motor vehicle transportation system for the transportation of passengers for more than five (5) miles outside its corporate limits.

Any municipality having a population of less than five hundred (500) according to the 1980 federal decennial census, being located north of U.S. Highway 82 in a county in which is located a United States Air Force base and a state-supported institution of higher learning established primarily for women, which criteria the Legislature finds to be conducive to the expansion of natural gas service to support contiguous areas of such Air Force base, may construct, own and/or operate a public utility or natural gas system and supply customers within the county for a distance of eleven (11) miles from the corporate limits.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5872; 1930, § 2452; 1942, § 3519-28; Laws, 1916, ch. 149; Laws, 1926, ch. 276; Laws, 1928, Ex. ch. 91; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 28; Laws, 1955, Ex. ch. 98; Laws, 1964, ch. 506; Laws, 1966, ch. 597, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 453; Laws, 1977, ch. 309; Laws, 1979, ch. 411, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 366; Laws, 1999, ch. 520, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1999.